incubator/apertium-rmy/apertium-rmy.rmy.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZŽŠabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzžš</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjectives"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="spost"   c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="tv"      c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"      c="Intransitive"/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Adpositions -->

    <pardef n="S__k/o">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__raklen">
      <e><p><l>ge</l><r><j/>ke<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r><j/>sa<s n="post"/></r></p></e>  <!-- FIXME: p. 67 ~ca or ~sa ? -->
      <e><p><l>dar</l><r><j/>tar<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>de</l><r><j/>te<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>g</l><r><j/>ko<s n="spost"/></r></p><par n="S__k/o"/></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="S__rakles">
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r><j/>ke<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sa</l><r><j/>sa<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tar</l><r><j/>tar<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><j/>te<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>k</l><r><j/>ko<s n="spost"/></r></p><par n="S__k/o"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="agora__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="/me__prn">
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>man</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>man</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l><r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/tu__prn">
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tut</l><r>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tu</l><r>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/vov__prn">
      <e><p><l>vov</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>leske</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>ke<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lesa</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>sa<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lestar</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>tar<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>leste</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>te<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>le</l><r>vov<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/voj__prn">
      <e><p><l>voj</l><r>voj<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lat</l><r>voj<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>voj<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>la</l><r>voj<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ame__prn">
      <e><p><l>ame</l><r>ame<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amen</l><r>ame<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amen</l><r>ame<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ame</l><r>ame<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/tume__prn">
      <e><p><l>tume</l><r>tume<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tumen</l><r>tume<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tumen</l><r>tume<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tume</l><r>tume<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/von__prn">
      <e><p><l>von</l><r>von<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>len</l><r>von<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>len</l><r>von<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>le</l><r>von<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->
 
    <pardef n="/o__det">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="agora"><i>agora</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anda"><i>anda</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="angla"><i>angla</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="intjal"><i>intjal</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="karing"><i>karing</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kata"><i>kata</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="katar"><i>katar</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="krugom"><i>krugom</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="maškar"><i>maškar</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pala"><i>pala</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="paša"><i>paša</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pe"><i>pe</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="perdal"><i>perdal</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pine"><i>pine</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="potriva"><i>potriva</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prečiv"><i>prečiv</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="rrota"><i>rrota</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sar"><i>sar</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sista"><i>sista</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="trujal"><i>trujal</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tela"><i>tela</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vaš"><i>vaš</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i>vi</i><par n="agora__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i/><par n="/me__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i/><par n="/tu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vov"><i/><par n="/vov__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="voj"><i/><par n="/voj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ame"><i/><par n="/ame__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tume"><i/><par n="/tume__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="von"><i/><par n="/von__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i/><par n="/o__det"/></e>
